Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6137.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-3 of the General Laws entitled "Registration of Vehicles" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-3-61.1. Fire Chief Emeritus —Frank M. Brown, Jr.
The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a
special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of former fire chief of the Hopkins
Hill Fire District, Frank M. Brown, Jr. This plate is to bear the identification “Fire Chief Emeritus”
along with an appropriate number and the plate shall be furnished without additional registration
charge for such period of time as Frank M. Brown, Jr. so desires.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002604
========